Illinois, session 104th, SB484.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 430/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. 9(Source: P.A. 93-615, eff. 11-19-03.)